Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Safety Glazing in Hazardous Locations

17.410.
Amended and reenacted as KRS 198B.300, effective July 15, 1980. [Transferred]

17.420.
Labeling requirements. [Repealed and reenacted.]

17.430.
Prohibitions. [Repealed and reenacted.]

17.440.
Amended and reenacted as KRS 198B.330, effective July 15, 1980.